Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS

CHAPTER 44. CRIMINAL DISTRICT ATTORNEYS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 44.001. ELECTION. The voters of each of the following counties elect a criminal district attorney: Anderson, Austin, Bastrop, Bexar, Bowie, Brazoria, Caldwell, Calhoun, Cass, Collin, Comal, Dallas, Deaf Smith, Denton, Eastland, Fannin, Galveston, Grayson, Gregg, Harrison, Hays, Hidalgo, Jackson, Jasper, Jefferson, Kaufman, Kendall, Lubbock, McLennan, Madison, Medina, Navarro, Newton, Panola, Polk, Randall, Rockwall, San Jacinto, Smith, Tarrant, Taylor, Tyler, Upshur, Van Zandt, Victoria, Walker, Waller, Wichita, Wood, and Yoakum.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 60, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.57(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 122, eff. Jan. 1, 1990; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 216, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1099, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 226, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 412, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 716, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 277 (H.B. 421), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2008.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.02(c), eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 6.03(b), eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 44.002. QUALIFICATIONS; BOND; COUNTY RISK MANAGEMENT POOL. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) or (c), a criminal district attorney must meet the qualifications and give the bond required of a district attorney by the constitution and general law.

(b) Instead of the bond required under Subsection (a), a criminal district attorney may obtain coverage from a county government risk management pool created under Chapter 119, Local Government Code. Coverage obtained under the pool must be in the same amount and satisfy the same bond conditions otherwise required by this section.

(c) A criminal district attorney is not required to execute the bond required under Subsection (a) and may perform the duties of office if the commissioners court of the county the attorney serves by order authorizes the county to self-insure against losses that would have been covered by the bond. An order adopted by a commissioners court under this subsection shall be kept and recorded by the county clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 439 (S.B. 1243), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 69 (S.B. 265), Sec. 2, eff. May 18, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO PARTICULAR COUNTIES

Sec. 44.101. ANDERSON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Anderson County must be at least 30 years of age.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall represent the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in the county. The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by general law on district and county attorneys.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) In addition to the salary paid by the state, the criminal district attorney is entitled to supplemental compensation from the county set by the commissioners court. The supplemental compensation must be in an amount necessary for the total compensation of the criminal district attorney to equal at least 90 percent of the total salary, including supplements, paid to the judge of the 3rd Judicial District by the state and Anderson, Henderson, and Houston counties. The county supplement shall be paid in equal installments, twice monthly, from the officers' salary fund of the county.

(e) The criminal district attorney may appoint a staff composed of at least three assistant criminal district attorneys, and investigators, stenographers, clerks, and any other personnel that the commissioners court authorizes.

(f) Except as limited by this section, the criminal district attorney, with the approval of the commissioners court, shall set the salary of the assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel. The commissioners court shall pay staff salaries in equal installments twice a month from the county officers' salary fund.

(g) In addition to staff salaries, the commissioners court may allow the criminal district attorney, his assistants, and investigators necessary expenses that the commissioners court considers reasonable. The expenses shall be paid as provided by law for other claims of expenses by county employees.

(h) The commissioners court may accept gifts and grants from any foundation, association, or political subdivision for the purpose of financing adequate and effective prosecution programs in the county. Municipalities in the county or district may allocate and grant the sums of money that their respective governing bodies approve to their county government for the support and maintenance of an effective prosecution program.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.58(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 44.108. AUSTIN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Austin County must meet the following qualifications:

(1) be at least 30 years old;

(2) have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years; and

(3) have been a resident of Austin County for at least two years before his election or appointment.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall represent the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in the county. The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by general law on district and county attorneys. This subsection does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel as it considers appropriate. The criminal district attorney may represent any county official or employee of Austin County in any civil matter in a court in the county if the matter arises out of the performance of official duties by the official or employee.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney does not represent the state in criminal cases before the municipal courts in Austin County.

(e) The criminal district attorney shall receive salary and compensation from the state in the amount provided by the General Appropriations Act for district attorneys. The Commissioners Court of Austin County may supplement the salary of the criminal district attorney paid by the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 216, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 44.111. BASTROP COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Bastrop County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Bastrop County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business. He shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts and any other court in which Bastrop County has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Bastrop County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The supplemental compensation paid to the criminal district attorney by the county and the salaries of the staff of the criminal district attorney shall be paid from the officers' salary fund if that fund is adequate. If that fund is not adequate, the commissioners court shall transfer the necessary funds from the general fund of the county to the officers' salary fund.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 3(c), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 44.115. BEXAR COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Bexar County shall attend each term and session of the district, county, and justice courts in Bexar County held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all matters before those courts. He shall represent Bexar County in any court in which the county has pending business. He serves as the district attorney for each district court in the county.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Bexar County that are conferred by law on district and county attorneys.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney and shall deposit them in the proper county funds as provided by law.

(d) The criminal district attorney does not represent the state in criminal cases before the municipal courts in Bexar County.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Bexar County, acting in conjunction with and on the approval of the criminal district attorney, may employ special counsel, learned in the law, to represent the county in a condemnation or eminent domain proceeding, particularly in a case involving the acquisition of rights-of-way. The employment shall be for the time and on the terms that the commissioners court and the criminal district attorney consider necessary and proper. The employment may be terminated in the manner provided by law for the removal of an assistant, investigator, or other employee of the criminal district attorney.

(f) The Commissioners Court of Bexar County may accept gifts and grants from any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or governmental entity for the purpose of financing or assisting effective prosecution, crime prevention or suppression, rehabilitation of offenders, or crime victim's assistance in Bexar County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.59(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 44.119. BOWIE COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Bowie County shall represent the state in all cases in the district and inferior courts of Bowie County and shall perform all other duties required of district and county attorneys under general law.

(b) All general laws relating to county or district attorneys apply to the criminal district attorney.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 44.120. BRAZORIA COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Brazoria County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Brazoria County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Brazoria County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Brazoria County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.128. CALDWELL COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Caldwell County must be at least 25 years old and must have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Caldwell County and each session and term of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on the county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Caldwell County may supplement the salary of the criminal district attorney paid by the state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.129. CALHOUN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Calhoun County shall attend each term and session of the district and inferior courts of Calhoun County, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business, and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall represent Calhoun County in any court in which the county has pending business. This subsection does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel in a civil matter as it considers appropriate.

(c) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Calhoun County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive a salary from the state in the amount provided by general law for the compensation of district attorneys. The Commissioners Court of Calhoun County may supplement the compensation paid by the state.

(f) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, may appoint the assistant criminal district attorneys that the Commissioners Court of Calhoun County may authorize. The salary of an assistant criminal district attorney must be at least $4,800 a year.

(g) The criminal district attorney may employ as many stenographers as the Commissioners Court of Calhoun County may authorize. The salary of a stenographer employed by the criminal district attorney must be at least $3,000 a year.

(h) The supplemental compensation paid to the criminal district attorney by the county and the salaries of the assistant criminal district attorneys and stenographers employed by the criminal district attorney shall be paid from the officers' salary fund if that fund is adequate. If the officers' salary fund is not adequate, the commissioners court shall transfer the necessary funds from the general fund of the county to the officers' salary fund.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.134. CASS COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Cass County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Cass County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Cass County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Cass County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.143. COLLIN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Collin County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Collin County held for the transaction of criminal business. He shall represent the state in all criminal and civil cases in the courts in the county unless otherwise provided by law.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Collin County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) A vacancy in the office of criminal district attorney is filled by appointment by the Commissioners Court of Collin County. The appointee holds office until the next general election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 521, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1081, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.146. COMAL COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Comal County must meet the following qualifications:

(1) be at least 30 years old;

(2) have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years; and

(3) be a resident of Comal County.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Comal County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall, with the approval of the commissioners court, appoint an assistant district attorney and other personnel necessary to the proper performance of the district attorney's duties. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff and necessary operating expenses of the office from county funds.

(e) The criminal district attorney shall, with the advice and consent of the commissioners court, designate one or more individuals to act as assistant criminal district attorney with exclusive responsibility for assisting the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 412, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.157. DALLAS COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Dallas County shall attend every term of the Criminal Court of Dallas County and of the Criminal District Court No. 2 of Dallas County and shall represent the state in all matters before those courts. The criminal district attorney has exclusive control of criminal cases and all cases heard on habeas corpus in the courts of Dallas County and serves as the district attorney of all the district courts in Dallas County.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Dallas County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees and commissions that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney. Not earlier than December 1 and not later than December 31 of each year, the criminal district attorney shall make a complete report to the county judge of Dallas County of the fees collected by the criminal district attorney.

(d) No other person may perform a duty of the criminal district attorney as provided by this section unless the criminal district attorney and his assistants are absent from the county or refuse or are unable to perform the duty.

(e) to (g) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1463, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1463, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 44.159. DEAF SMITH COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Deaf Smith County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Deaf Smith County and shall represent the state in all criminal and civil cases in the courts in the county.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Deaf Smith County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall assist the county attorney in Oldham County on his request or, in the event of his inability to act, on appointment by the judge of the district court in Oldham County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 44.161. DENTON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Denton County must be at least 28 years old, must have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years, and must have been a resident of Denton County for at least three years before his election or appointment.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district and inferior courts of Denton County, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall represent Denton County in any court in which the county has pending business. This subsection does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel in a civil matter as it considers appropriate.

(d) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Denton County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(e) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(f) The Commissioners Court of Denton County may, in its discretion, supplement the compensation paid by the state to the criminal district attorney. The supplemental compensation paid by the county shall be paid from the officers' salary fund of the county if that fund is adequate. If that fund is not adequate, the commissioners court shall transfer the necessary funds from the general funds of the county to the officers' salary fund.

(g) The criminal district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law, whether or not he receives compensation for that practice.

(h) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, may appoint the assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel that the Commissioners Court of Denton County may authorize. The salaries of the members of the staff of the criminal district attorney shall be paid in equal monthly or bimonthly installments from the officers' salary fund of the county.

(i) The legislature may provide the supplemental funds to the criminal district attorney it considers necessary for supplementation of his staff.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.167. EASTLAND COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Eastland County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Eastland County and shall represent the state in all criminal and civil cases in the courts of the county.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Eastland County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.174. FANNIN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Fannin County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller as appropriated by the legislature.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 277 (H.B. 421), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2008.

Sec. 44.184. GALVESTON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Galveston County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Galveston County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Galveston County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Galveston County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney may represent any county official or employee of Galveston County other than a member of the commissioners court in any civil matter in a court in the county if the matter arises out of the performance of official duties by the officer or employee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.191. GRAYSON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Grayson County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller as appropriated by the legislature.

(e) A vacancy in the office of criminal district attorney is filled by appointment by the Commissioners Court of Grayson County. The appointee holds office until the next general election.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 716, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 44.192. GREGG COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Gregg County shall represent the state in all criminal cases in the district, county, and justice courts of Gregg County, and in the municipal courts of the county if the defendant is charged with violating a state law, and shall represent the state in all cases in Gregg County in which it is the duty of a county or district attorney to represent the state.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the same fees that are provided by law for county and district attorneys.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.202. HARRISON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Harrison County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Harrison County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Harrison County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Harrison County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney, if paid at least $16,000 a year, and the assistants to the criminal district attorney, if paid at least $10,000 a year, may not refer legal business to any person engaged in the private practice of law. This subsection does not prohibit an act required in the performance of an official duty as criminal district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.205. HAYS COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Hays County must be at least 25 years old and have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Hays County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters pending before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.208. HIDALGO COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Hidalgo County shall perform the duties of district attorney in all the judicial districts in Hidalgo County and the duties of county attorney in all the county courts of the county.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Hidalgo County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.220. JACKSON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Jackson County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Jackson County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on the county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The Commissioners Court of Jackson County may supplement the salary paid by the state to the criminal district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.221. JASPER COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Jasper County must be at least 25 years old and have been a practicing attorney in this state for five years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Jasper County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller of public accounts as appropriated by the legislature. The Commissioners Court of Jasper County shall pay the criminal district attorney an additional amount so that the total compensation of the criminal district attorney equals at least 90 percent of the total salary paid to each of the judges of the district courts in Jasper County. The compensation paid by the county shall be paid in monthly or bimonthly installments, as determined by the commissioners court.

(f) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel that the commissioners court may authorize. The salary of a staff member is in an amount recommended by the criminal district attorney and approved by the commissioners court. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal monthly or bimonthly installments from county funds.

(g) The legislature may provide for additional staff members to be paid from state funds if it considers supplementation of the criminal district attorney's staff necessary.

(h) The criminal district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law or receive a fee for the referral of a case.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.223. JEFFERSON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Jefferson County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Jefferson County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business, and shall exclusively represent the state in all matters before those courts. He shall represent Jefferson County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Jefferson County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) Jefferson County is entitled to receive annually from the state an amount equal to the compensation paid by the state to prosecutors subject to Chapter 46. The compensation from the state shall be paid into the salary fund of the county in equal monthly installments. The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive as compensation an amount at least equal to the amount paid to the county by the state under this subsection. The criminal district attorney is not entitled to receive a salary under Section 46.003(a), but is entitled to supplemental compensation under Section 46.003(b) and expenses under Section 46.004.

(e) Jefferson County is not entitled to the benefits of Subchapter C, Chapter 41, in addition to the state compensation provided by Subsection (d).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 733, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 44.229. KAUFMAN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Kaufman County must be at least 25 years old and have been a practicing attorney in this state for five years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Kaufman County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.230. KENDALL COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Kendall County must meet the following qualifications:

(1) be at least 30 years old;

(2) have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years; and

(3) have been a resident of Kendall County for at least one year before election or appointment.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Kendall County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district and inferior courts of Kendall County, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall represent Kendall County in any court in which the county has pending business. This subsection does not require the criminal district attorney to represent the county in a delinquent tax suit or condemnation proceeding and does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel in a civil matter at any time it considers appropriate to do so.

(e) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(f) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller as appropriated by the legislature. The Commissioners Court of Kendall County shall pay the criminal district attorney an additional amount so that the total compensation of the criminal district attorney equals at least 90 percent of the total salary paid to the judge of the 451st District Court in Kendall County. The compensation paid by the county shall be paid in semiweekly or bimonthly installments, as determined by the commissioners court.

(g) The criminal district attorney or the Commissioners Court of Kendall County may accept gifts and grants from any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or governmental entity for the purpose of financing or assisting effective prosecution, crime prevention or suppression, rehabilitation of offenders, substance abuse education, treatment and prevention, or crime victim assistance programs in Kendall County. The criminal district attorney shall account for and report to the commissioners court all gifts or grants accepted under this subsection.

(h) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting affairs of the office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel that the commissioners court may authorize. The salary of a staff member is an amount recommended by the criminal district attorney and approved by the commissioners court. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal semiweekly or bimonthly installments from county funds.

(i) The criminal district attorney shall, with the advice and consent of the commissioners court, designate one or more individuals to act as an assistant criminal district attorney with exclusive responsibility for assisting the commissioners court. An individual designated as an assistant criminal district attorney under this subsection must have extensive experience in representing public entities and knowledge of the laws affecting counties, including the open meetings and open records laws under Chapters 551 and 552.

(j) Kendall County is entitled to receive from the state an amount equal to the amount provided in the General Appropriations Act to district attorneys for the payment of staff salaries and office expenses.

(k) The legislature may provide for additional staff members to be paid from state funds if it considers supplementation of the criminal district attorney's staff to be necessary.

(l) The criminal district attorney and assistant criminal district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law or receive a fee for the referral of a case.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.02(d), eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 44.252. LUBBOCK COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Lubbock County must be at least 25 years old and have been a practicing attorney in this state for four years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Lubbock County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.255. MCLENNAN COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of McLennan County has all the powers, duties, and privileges in McLennan County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.257. MADISON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Madison County has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Madison County that are conferred by law on district and county attorneys.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 226, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.263. MEDINA COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Medina County must meet the following qualifications:

(1) be at least 30 years old;

(2) have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years; and

(3) have been a resident of Medina County for at least one year before election or appointment.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Medina County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district and inferior courts of Medina County, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall represent Medina County in any court in which the county has pending business. This subsection does not require the criminal district attorney to represent the county in a delinquent tax suit or condemnation proceeding and does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel in a civil matter at any time it considers appropriate.

(e) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(f) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller as appropriated by the legislature. The Commissioners Court of Medina County shall pay the criminal district attorney an additional amount so that the total compensation of the criminal district attorney equals at least 90 percent of the total salary paid to the judge of the 454th District Court in Medina County. The compensation paid by the county shall be paid in semiweekly or bimonthly installments, as determined by the commissioners court.

(g) The criminal district attorney or the Commissioners Court of Medina County may accept gifts and grants from any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or governmental entity for the purpose of financing or assisting effective prosecution, crime prevention or suppression, rehabilitation of offenders, substance abuse education, treatment and prevention, or crime victim assistance programs in Medina County. The criminal district attorney shall account for and report to the commissioners court all gifts or grants accepted under this subsection.

(h) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting affairs of the office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel that the commissioners court may authorize. The salary of a staff member is an amount recommended by the criminal district attorney and approved by the commissioners court. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal semiweekly or bimonthly installments from county funds.

(i) The criminal district attorney shall, with the advice and consent of the commissioners court, designate one or more individuals to act as an assistant criminal district attorney with exclusive responsibility for assisting the commissioners court. An individual designated as an assistant criminal district attorney under this subsection must have extensive experience in representing public entities and knowledge of the laws affecting counties, including the open meetings and open records laws under Chapters 551 and 552.

(j) Medina County is entitled to receive from the state an amount equal to the amount provided in the General Appropriations Act to district attorneys for the payment of staff salaries and office expenses.

(k) The legislature may provide for additional staff members to be paid from state funds if it considers supplementation of the criminal district attorney's staff to be necessary.

(l) The criminal district attorney and assistant criminal district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law or receive a fee for the referral of a case.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 6.03(c), eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 44.275. NAVARRO COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Navarro County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Navarro County and shall represent the state in all criminal and civil cases in the district and inferior courts of the county.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Navarro County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.276. NEWTON COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Newton County must be at least 25 years old and have been a practicing attorney in this state for five years.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Newton County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive in equal monthly installments compensation from the state equal to the amount paid by the state to district attorneys. The state compensation shall be paid by the comptroller as appropriated by the legislature.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.283. PANOLA COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Panola County shall represent the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in the county. The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by general law on district and county attorneys. The criminal district attorney may represent any county official or employee of Panola County in any civil matter in a court in the county if the matter arises out of the performance of official duties by the official or employee.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(c) The criminal district attorney does not represent the state in criminal cases before the municipal courts in Panola County.

(d) The criminal district attorney is entitled to receive a salary from the state in the amount provided by general law for district attorneys.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 9, eff. Jan. 1, 1993.

Sec. 44.287. POLK COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the 258th and 411th district courts of Polk County and each term and session of the inferior courts held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by general law on district and county attorneys in this state.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney in this state.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

(f) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 60, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.291. RANDALL COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Randall County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Randall County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Randall County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Randall County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.299. ROCKWALL COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Rockwall County must be a practicing attorney in this state.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Rockwall County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Rockwall County shall pay the salaries of the members of the staff of the criminal district attorney in equal bimonthly installments from the officers' salary fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.304. SAN JACINTO COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the 258th and 411th district courts of San Jacinto County and each term and session of the inferior courts held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by general law on district and county attorneys in this state.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney in this state.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1990. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 8, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

Sec. 44.312. SMITH COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Smith County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Smith County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Smith County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Smith County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.320. TARRANT COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Tarrant County shall attend each term and session of the criminal district courts of Tarrant County and each term and session of the County Court of Tarrant County held for the transaction of criminal business and shall represent the state in all matters before those courts. He shall represent Tarrant County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Tarrant County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts, except in a condemnation case in which the commissioners court hires special counsel to represent the county as provided by Subsection (d).

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees of office that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The Commissioners Court of Tarrant County may employ special counsel of its own choice, learned in the law, to represent the county in condemnation or eminent domain proceedings, to assist the commissioners court, the county engineer, or other county employees in preparing documents necessary in the acquisition of rights-of-way for the county or in the event that the county is required to obtain rights-of-way for state highways, or to assist the county in the acquisition of those rights-of-way. The commissioners court shall set the terms of the employment of special counsel as it considers proper. The commissioners court shall pay the compensation of the special counsel from the road and bridge fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.321. TAYLOR COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Taylor County shall perform all the duties in Taylor County required of district attorneys by general law and shall perform the duties of county attorney in Taylor County.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall assist the county attorney of Callahan County or Coleman County on the request of the county attorney or if appointed to do so by the judge of a district court in that county when the county attorney is unable to act.

(c) The Commissioners Court of Taylor County shall supplement the state salary of the criminal district attorney in an amount not less than $4,000 a year.

(d) The criminal district attorney is entitled to the expenses and allowances provided by the General Appropriations Act for district attorneys who serve more than one county.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Taylor County shall provide suitable office space for the criminal district attorney in the county courthouse.

(f) The Commissioners Court of Taylor County shall determine the salaries of the employees of the criminal district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.52(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 44.329. TYLER COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Tyler County shall represent the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in Tyler County.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in this state.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) With the approval of the Commissioners Court of Tyler County, the criminal district attorney may appoint the staff required for the proper and efficient operation and administration of the office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.330. UPSHUR COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Upshur County shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Upshur County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Upshur County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Upshur County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.334. VAN ZANDT COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Van Zandt County must be at least 25 years old and must have been a practicing attorney in this state for two years. However, if no person meeting those qualifications files as a candidate for the office on or before the 30th day before the last day on which a person may file as a candidate in an election to that office, the qualifications imposed by this subsection do not apply to that election.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Van Zandt County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of his office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel as the Commissioners Court of Van Zandt County may authorize. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal monthly or bimonthly installments from the officers' salary fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.335. VICTORIA COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Victoria County shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Victoria County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts. He shall represent Victoria County in any court in which the county has pending business.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Victoria County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.336. WALKER COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Walker County must be at least 25 years old, must have been a practicing attorney in this state for three years, and must have been a resident of Walker County for at least two years before election or appointment.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district and inferior courts of Walker County, except municipal courts, held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall represent Walker County in any court in which the county has pending business. This subsection does not require the criminal district attorney to represent the county in a delinquent tax suit or condemnation proceeding and does not prevent the county from retaining other legal counsel in a civil matter at any time it considers appropriate to do so.

(d) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Walker County relating to criminal or civil matters involving the county or state that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(e) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel as the Commissioners Court of Walker County may authorize. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal monthly installments from the general fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.337. WALLER COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Waller County must have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least three years.

(b) The criminal district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Waller County that are conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall, with the approval of the commissioners court, appoint an assistant district attorney or attorneys and other personnel necessary to the proper performance of the district attorney's duties. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff and necessary operating expenses of the office from county funds.

(e) The criminal district attorney or the Commissioners Court of Waller County may accept gifts and grants from any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or governmental entity for the purpose of financing or assisting effective prosecution, crime prevention or suppression, rehabilitation of offenders, substance abuse education, treatment and prevention, or crime victim's assistance programs in Waller County. The criminal district attorney shall account for and report to the commissioners court all gifts or grants accepted under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 44.343. WICHITA COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney shall represent the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in the county. The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by general law on district and county attorneys.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.60(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 221, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1252, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 44.350. WOOD COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney of Wood County must be at least 25 years old and must have been a practicing attorney in this state for five years. However, if no person meeting those qualifications files as a candidate for the office on or before the 30th day before the last day on which a person may file as a candidate in an election to that office, the qualifications imposed by this subsection do not apply to that election.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Wood County and each term and session of the inferior courts of the county held for the transaction of criminal business and shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters before those courts.

(c) The criminal district attorney shall perform the duties conferred by law on county and district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(e) The criminal district attorney, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, may appoint a staff composed of assistant criminal district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, clerks, and other personnel as the Commissioners Court of Wood County may authorize. The commissioners court shall pay the salaries of the staff in equal monthly or bimonthly installments from the officers' salary fund of the county.

(f) The legislature may provide for additional staff members to be paid from state funds if it considers supplementation of the criminal district attorney's staff to be necessary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 44.351. YOAKUM COUNTY. (a) The criminal district attorney represents the state in all matters in the district and inferior courts in the county. The criminal district attorney shall perform the other duties that are conferred by general law on district and county attorneys.

(b) The criminal district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by a district or county attorney.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.61(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.